src/fst/test/old-gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-kiskiswew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - kîskiswêw - ok : # VTA (VTA3 AEW) 

###PRS###
## INDEPENDENT ##
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO:    kikîskison # LOCAL DIR
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1PlO:    kikîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1PlO:    kikîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO:    kikîskisonâwâw

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO:    kikîskisotin # LOCAL INVERSE
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO:    kikîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO:    kikîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO:    kikîskisotinâwâw


     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO:    nikîskiswâw # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO:    kikîskiswâw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO:    nikîskiswânân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO:    kikîskiswânaw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO:    kikîskiswâwâw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO:    nikîskiswâwak # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO:    kikîskiswâwak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO:    nikîskiswânânak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO:    kikîskiswânawak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO:    kikîskiswâwâwak

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nikîskisomâwa # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kikîskisomâwa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nikîskisomânâna
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kikîskisomânawa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kikîskisomâwâwa

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO:    nikîskisok # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO:    kikîskisok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO:    nikîskisokonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO:    kikîskisokonaw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO:    kikîskisokowâw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO:    [nikîskisokowak, nikîskisokwak] # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO:    [kikîskisokowak, kikîskisokwak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO:    nikîskisokonânak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO:    kikîskisokonawak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO:    kikîskisokowâwak

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    nikîskisomâwa # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kikîskisomâwa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    nikîskisomânâna
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kikîskisomânawa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kikîskisomâwâwa

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kîskiswêw # THIRD DIR
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kîskiswêwak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:    kîskiswêyiwa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    kîskisomêw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    kîskisomêwak

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    [kîskisok, kîskisokow] # THIRD INV
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    [kîskisokowak, kîskisokwak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kîskisokoyiwa


## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-kîskisoyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-kîskisoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-kîskisoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-kîskisoyêk

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-kîskisotân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-kîskisotâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-kîskisotâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-kîskisotakok


     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO:    ê-kîskiswak # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO:    ê-kîskiswat
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO:    ê-kîskiswâyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO:   ê-kîskiswâyahk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO:    ê-kîskiswâyêk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO:    ê-kîskiswakik # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO:    ê-kîskiswacik
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO:    ê-kîskiswâyâhkik
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO:   ê-kîskiswâyahkok
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO:    ê-kîskiswâyêkok

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskisomak # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskisomat
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskisomâyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   ê-kîskisomâyahk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskisomâyêk

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO:    ê-kîskisot # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO:    ê-kîskisosk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO:    ê-kîskisokoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO:   ê-kîskisokoyahk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO:    ê-kîskisokoyêk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO:    ê-kîskisocik # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO:    ê-kîskisoskik
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO:    ê-kîskisokoyâhkik
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO:   ê-kîskisokoyahkok
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO:    ê-kîskisokoyêkok

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    ê-kîskisomit # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    ê-kîskisomisk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    ê-kîskisokoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   ê-kîskisokoyahk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    ê-kîskisokoyêk

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskiswât # THIRD DIR
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskiswâcik
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-kîskiswâyit
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskisomât
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    ê-kîskisomâcik

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    ê-kîskisokot # THIRD INV
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    ê-kîskisokocik
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-kîskisokoyit

## FUTURE CONDITIONAL ##
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO:    kîskisoyani # LOCAL DIR
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO:    kîskisoyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO:    kîskisoyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO:    kîskisoyêko

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO:    kîskisotâni # LOCAL INVERSE
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO:    kîskisotâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO:    kîskisotâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO:    kîskisotako


     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO:    kîskiswaki # MIXED DIR (obj sg)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO:    kîskiswaci
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO:    kîskiswâyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO:   [kîskiswâyahko, kîskiswâyahki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO:    kîskiswâyêko
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO:    kîskiswakwâwi # MIXED DIR (obj pl)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO:    kîskiswatwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO:    kîskiswâyâhkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO:   kîskiswâyahkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO:    kîskiswâyêkwâwi

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kîskisomaki # MIXED DIR (obj. obv.)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kîskisomaci
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kîskisomâyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO:   [kîskisomâyahko, kîskisomâyahki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kîskisomâyêko

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO:    kîskisoci # MIXED INV (sbj sg)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO:    kîskisoski
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO:    kîskisokoyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO:   [kîskisokoyahko, kîskisokoyahki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO:    kîskisokoyêko
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO:    kîskisotwâwi # MIXED INV (sbj pl)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO:    kîskisoskwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO:    kîskisokoyâhkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO:   kîskisokoyahkwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO:    kîskisokoyêkwâwi

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:    kîskisomici # MIXED INV (sbj obv.)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:    kîskisomiski
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:    kîskisokoyâhki
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO:   [kîskisokoyahko, kîskisokoyahki]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:    kîskisokoyêko

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:    kîskiswâci # THIRD DIR
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:    kîskiswâtwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskiswâyici
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:    kîskisomâci
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:    kîskisomâtwâwi

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:    kîskisokoci # THIRD INV
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:    kîskisokotwâwi
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisokoyici

## IMPERATIVE ##
#LOCAL IMMEDIATE#
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:    kîskison
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:    kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:    kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:    kîskisok
#LOCAL DELAYED#
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO:    kîskisôhkan
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO:    kîskisôhkâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO:    kîskisôhkâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO:    kîskisôhkêk

#MIXED IMMEDIATE#
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:    kîskis # Obj. Sg.
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:    kîskisohk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO:    kîskiswâtân

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:    kîskisok # Obj. Pl.
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:    kîskisohkok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO:    kîskiswâtânik
#MIXED DELAYED#
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO:    kîskiswâhkan # Obj. Sg.
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO:    kîskiswâhkêk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO:    kîskiswâhkahk

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO:    kîskiswâhkanik # Obj. Pl.
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO:    kîskiswâhkêkok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO:    kîskiswâhkahkok


###PRT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:    kikî-kîskison # LOCAL DIR
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1PlO:    kikî-kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1PlO:    kikî-kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:    kikî-kîskisonâwâw

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:    kikî-kîskisotin # LOCAL INVERSE
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2SgO:    kikî-kîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+2PlO:    kikî-kîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+2PlO:    kikî-kîskisotinâwâw

## CONJUNCT ##
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:    ê-kî-kîskisoyan # LOCAL DIR
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Sg+1PlO:    ê-kî-kîskisoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+1PlO:    ê-kî-kîskisoyâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:    ê-kî-kîskisoyêk

     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+2SgO:    ê-kî-kîskisotân # LOCAL INVERSE
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+2SgO:    ê-kî-kîskisotâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Pl+2PlO:    ê-kî-kîskisotâhk
     PV/e+kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prt+1Sg+2PlO:    ê-kî-kîskisotakok


###FUT+INT###

## INDEPENDENT ##
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1SgO:    kiwî-kîskison # LOCAL DIR
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg+1PlO:    kiwî-kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1PlO:    kiwî-kîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl+1SgO:    kiwî-kîskisonâwâw

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+2SgO:    kiwî-kîskisotin # LOCAL INVERSE
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+2SgO:    kiwî-kîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl+2PlO:    kiwî-kîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg+2PlO:    kiwî-kîskisotinâwâw
